test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_V_INDEP_niimi_gt-norm.yaml
     1+niimi+VAI+X+Prt+3+Pl: niniimimbanag
     1+niimi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: niniimimgobanan
     1+niimi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niniimimgobanag
     2+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: giniimimindigan
     2+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: giniimimindigag
     2+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: giniimiminbanan
     2+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: giniimiminbanag
     2+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: giniimimingobanan
     2+niimi+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giniimimingobanag
     2+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: giniimimwdigan
     2+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: giniimimwdigag
     2+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: giniimimwbanan
     2+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: giniimimwbanag
     2+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: giniimimwgobanan
     2+niimi+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giniimimwgobanag
     2+niimi+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: giniimiwdigan
     2+niimi+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: giniimiwdigag
     2+niimi+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: giniimiwbanan
     2+niimi+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: giniimiwbanag
     2+niimi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: giniimiwgobanan
     2+niimi+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giniimiwgobanag
     2+niimi+VAI+X+Dub+3+4: giniimimdigan
     2+niimi+VAI+X+Dub+3+Pl: giniimimdigag
     2+niimi+VAI+X+Prt+3+4: giniimimbanan
     2+niimi+VAI+X+Prt+3+Pl: giniimimbanag
     2+niimi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: giniimimgobanan
     2+niimi+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giniimimgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: niimisiimindigan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niimisiimindigag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: niimisiiminbanan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niimisiiminbanag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niimisiimingobanan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niimisiimingobanag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: niimisiimwdigan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niimisiimwdigag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: niimisiimwbanan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niimisiimwbanag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niimisiimwgobanan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niimisiimwgobanag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: niimisiiwdigan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: niimisiiwdigag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: niimisiiwbanan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: niimisiiwbanag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: niimisiiwgobanan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niimisiiwgobanag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+4: niimisiimdigan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+Pl: niimisiimdigag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+4: niimisiimbanan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+Pl: niimisiimbanag
     niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: niimisiimgobanan
     niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niimisiimgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: niniimisiimindigan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niniimisiimindigag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: niniimisiiminbanan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niniimisiiminbanag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niniimisiimingobanan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niniimisiimingobanag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: niniimisiimwdigan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niniimisiimwdigag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: niniimisiimwbanan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niniimisiimwbanag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niniimisiimwgobanan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niniimisiimwgobanag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: niniimisiiwdigan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: niniimisiiwdigag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: niniimisiiwbanan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: niniimisiiwbanag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: niniimisiiwgobanan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niniimisiiwgobanag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+4: niniimisiimdigan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+Pl: niniimisiimdigag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+4: niniimisiimbanan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+Pl: niniimisiimbanag
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: niniimisiimgobanan
     1+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niniimisiimgobanag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: giniimisiimindigan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: giniimisiimindigag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: giniimisiiminbanan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: giniimisiiminbanag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: giniimisiimingobanan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giniimisiimingobanag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: giniimisiimwdigan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: giniimisiimwdigag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: giniimisiimwbanan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: giniimisiimwbanag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: giniimisiimwgobanan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giniimisiimwgobanag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: giniimisiiwdigan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: giniimisiiwdigag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: giniimisiiwbanan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: giniimisiiwbanag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: giniimisiiwgobanan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giniimisiiwgobanag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+4: giniimisiimdigan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+Pl: giniimisiimdigag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+4: giniimisiimbanan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+Pl: giniimisiimbanag
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: giniimisiimgobanan
     2+niimi+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giniimisiimgobanag
     
